California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding any other law, the bureau shall cite any person, and that person shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), for operating an institution without proper approval to operate issued by the bureau pursuant to this chapter. The maximum fine for unlicensed activity is separate and not inclusive of fines for other violations or refunds ordered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 18.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94944.5.

Each institution subject to this chapter shall be deemed to have authorized its accrediting agency to provide the bureau, the Attorney General, any district attorney, city attorney, or the Student Aid Commission, within 30 days of written notice, copies of all documents and other material concerning the institution that are maintained by the accrediting agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94944.6.

Within 30 days of receiving a written notice from the bureau, the Attorney General, district attorney, city attorney, or the Student Aid Commission pursuant to Section 94944.5, an accrediting agency shall provide the requesting entity with all documents or other material concerning an institution accredited by that agency that are designated specifically or by category in the written notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94945.

(a) This chapter does not limit or preclude the enforcement of rights or remedies under any other applicable statute or law.

(b) This chapter does not limit or preclude the Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney from taking any action otherwise authorized under any other applicable statute or law.

(c) If the bureau has reason to believe that an institution has engaged in a pattern or practice of violating the provisions of this chapter or any other applicable law that involves multiple students or other claimants, the bureau shall contract with the Attorney General for investigative and prosecutorial services, as
 necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 36.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Severability [94946. - 94946.]

94946.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Reporting [94948. - 94948.]

94948.

In addition to any other reporting requirements under this chapter, the director shall provide written updates to the Legislature every six months and shall participate in all oversight hearings conducted by the appropriate policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Senate and Assembly. The updates shall describe the bureau’s progress in protecting consumers and enforcing the provisions of this chapter and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information received pursuant to Section 325 of the Business and Professions Code:

(a) The total number of student complaints received.

(b) The general nature of these complaints.

(c) The outcome of these student complaints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 26.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20.6. Office of Student Assistance and Relief [94949.7. - 94949.8.]

94949.7.

There is hereby established an Office of Student Assistance and Relief for the purpose of advancing and promoting the rights of prospective students, current students, or past students of private postsecondary educational institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 27.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94949.71.

(a) The duties of the office shall be vested in a chief, who shall be appointed by the director. The chief, and each staff employee of the office, shall have experience and expertise, commensurate with their position, advocating on behalf of students and consumers and shall have knowledge in the state and federal laws governing student protection, student financial aid and loan programs, and the policies and practices of private postsecondary educational institutions.

(b) For purposes of this article, “office” means the Office of Student Assistance and Relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 90.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94949.72.

Duties of the office shall include all of the following:

(a) Conducting outreach and providing information and assistance to students who have been affected by the unlawful activities or closure of an institution regarding their rights under state and federal law, including information about how and where to file a complaint, and to ensure that those students successfully access available state and federal relief programs. No later than July 1, 2017, the office shall prioritize and immediately conduct the activities outlined in Section 94949.73.

(b) Serving as a primary point of contact to address the needs of private postsecondary education students and
 working in consultation with state and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the Student Aid Commission, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Department of Veterans Affairs, the federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, and the United States Department of Education.

(c) The office may also conduct both of the following activities:

(1) Provide outreach to students and prospective students to provide them with, among other information, information on making informed decisions in selecting postsecondary educational institutions, student rights regarding school performance disclosures, enrollment agreements, and cancellation and refund policies, how to contact the office and the bureau for assistance, student loan rights and assistance, and free nonprofit community based resources.

(2) Conduct data and information research concerning industry trends and enforcement actions from various sources, including, but not limited to, annual reports provided to the bureau pursuant to Section 94934, the United States Department of Education, accrediting agencies, and the California Department of Veterans Affairs to help determine the trends and potential violations of the act. The office shall advise the director and bureau chief of its findings.

(d) The office shall provide, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature an annual written update regarding the office’s progress in protecting students and conducting the duties of the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 27.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94949.73.

(a) The office shall provide individualized assistance to students to relieve or mitigate the economic and educational opportunity loss incurred by those students who attended a Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institution or other eligible institution.

(b) Specific services provided by the office shall include all of the following:

(1) Outreach and education to students regarding the assistance available from the office.

(2) Screening requests for assistance received by the office and providing individualized assistance to help students determine their relief eligibility, identify and obtain necessary documents, complete and submit
 applications, and provide additional services as necessary.

(c) For purposes of this section, “other eligible institution” means an institution identified by the office whose unlawful activities or closure has resulted in its students being eligible for repayment from the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, debt relief from the United States Department of Education, or other student financial aid relief.

(d) (1) The office shall quarterly report by posting on the bureau’s internet website, through September 1, 2018, on all of the following:

(A) A summary of the outreach and education activities conducted by the office pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and the number of students served from Corinthian Colleges, Inc., institutions and every other eligible institution.

(B) A detailed summary of services provided to those students, as follows:

(i) The number of students assisted with submitting Student Tuition Recovery Fund claims to the bureau by the office, and of the claims submitted, the number that are pending, on appeal, or have been approved or denied. For the claims that have been approved, the office shall report the amount of student loans canceled, the total of student loans paid off, the total amount of cash reimbursed to students, and the total amount of educational credit granted.

(ii) The number of students assisted with submitting federal loan forgiveness claims, and of the claims submitted, the number of those claims that are pending, on appeal, or have been approved or denied. For the claims that have been approved, the office shall report the estimated total in
 student loans canceled and the total amount of funds refunded to students.

(iii) The number of students assisted with private student loan relief, other than through Student Tuition Recovery Fund claims, and a summary of assistance provided and relief outcomes obtained.

(iv) The number of students whom the office helped to obtain income-dependent repayment plans on their federal loans, and of those students, the number of students helped out of default on the federal loans through consolidation or rehabilitation.

(2) The office shall provide, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, the Legislature, the department, and the bureau a final report summarizing the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) by January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 104.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94949.8.

(a) An institution that qualifies as a public institution of higher education pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 94858.5, that is operated by another state, and that maintains a physical presence in this state may apply for an approval to operate from the bureau.

(b) (1) With regard to a public institution of higher education approved pursuant to this section, the bureau shall administer and enforce this chapter, and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, in the same manner and to the same extent as if such institutions were private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858.

(2) A public institution of higher education approved pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of, and the regulations adopted pursuant to, this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as if it was a private postsecondary educational institution, as defined in Section 94858, including the provisions related to fees, annual reports, compliance inspections, and the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.

(3) Approval of a public institution of higher education pursuant to this section does not, in and of itself, qualify the institution for participation in the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5.

(c) As necessary or appropriate, the bureau shall publish public guidance regarding the application of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter to a public institution of higher education approved pursuant to this section. The bureau’s development and publication of any such guidance is exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The bureau shall, on or before July 1, 2024, amend any regulations that conflict with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 19.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Termination [94950. - 94950.]

94950.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 20.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 8, commencing with Section 94800.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Continuation of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund [95000. - 95010.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [95000. - 95000.]

95000.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, upon the repeal of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800), the Student Tuition Recovery Fund shall be continued in existence under the administration of the Department of Consumer Affairs, and the moneys remaining in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the Department of Consumer Affairs for the purpose of paying claims filed under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, upon the repeal of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800), the Department of Consumer Affairs shall continue to process and pay claims against the Student Tuition Recovery Fund until all claims pending as of the repeal of Chapter 8 (commencing
 with Section 94800) are processed, or until the moneys remaining in the fund are exhausted, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 7.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 95010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Operative Date [95010. - 95010.]

95010.

This chapter shall become operative upon the repeal of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800), as added by Assembly Bill 48 of the 2009–10 Regular Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 7.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section provides for delayed operation of Chapter 8.5, commencing with Section 95000.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 14. MISCELLANEOUS [99000. - 101460.]



  PART 65. MISCELLANEOUS [99000. - 99352.]



  CHAPTER 1. Western Regional Education Compact [99000. - 99005.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Compact [99000. - 99005.]

99000.

The Governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with each or all of the 11 western states and the States of Alaska and Hawaii for the purpose of cooperating with such states in the formation of a Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education. Notice of intention to withdraw from such compact shall be executed and transmitted by the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

99001.

The form and contents of such compact shall be substantially as provided in this section and the effect of its provisions shall be interpreted and administered in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.
Western Regional Higher Education Compact

The contracting states do hereby agree as follows:
 
Article 1
Whereas, The future of this Nation and of the Western States is dependent upon the quality of the education of its youth; and

Whereas, Many of the Western States individually do not have sufficient numbers of potential students to warrant the establishment and maintenance within their borders of adequate facilities in all of the essential fields of technical, professional, and graduate training, nor do all of the states have the financial ability to furnish within their borders institutions capable of providing acceptable standards of training in all of the fields mentioned above; and

Whereas, It is believed that the Western States, or groups of such states within the region, co-operatively can provide acceptable and efficient educational facilities to meet the needs of the region and of the students thereof; now, therefore,

The States of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming, and the Territories of Alaska and Hawaii, do hereby covenant and agree as follows: 
 
Article 2
Each of the compacting states and territories pledges to each of the other compacting states and territories faithful co-operation in carrying out all the purposes of this compact.
 
Article 3
The compacting states and territories hereby create the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education, hereinafter called the commission. Said commission shall be a body corporate of each compacting state and territory and an agency thereof. The commission shall have all the powers and duties set forth herein, including the power to sue and be sued, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states and territories. 
 
Article 4
The commission shall consist of three resident members from each compacting state or territory. At all times one commissioner from each compacting state or territory shall be an educator engaged in the field of higher education in the state or territory from which he is appointed.

The commissioners from each state and territory shall be appointed by the governor thereof as provided by law in such state or territory. Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state or territory from which he shall have been appointed.

The terms of each commissioner shall be four years; provided, however, that the first three commissioners shall be appointed as follows; one for two years, one for three years, and one for four years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor shall be appointed and qualified. If any office becomes vacant for any reason, the governor shall appoint a commissioner to fill the office for the remainder of the unexpired term.
 
Article 5
Any business transacted at any meeting of the commission must be by affirmative vote of a majority of the whole number of compacting states and territories.

One or more commissioners from a majority of the compacting states and territories shall constitute a quorum for the transacting of business.

Each compacting state and territory represented at any meeting of the commission is entitled to one vote.
 
Article 6
The commission shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice chairman, and may appoint, and at its pleasure dismiss or remove, such officers, agents, and employees as may be required to carry out the purpose of this compact; and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation, having due regard for the importance of the responsibilities involved.

The commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses from the funds of the commission.
 
Article 7
The commission shall adopt a seal and bylaws and shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its management and control.

The commission may elect such committees as it deems necessary for the carrying out of its functions.

The commission shall establish and maintain an office within one of the compacting states for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time, but in any event must meet at least once a year. The chairman may call such additional meetings and upon the request of a majority of the commissioners of three or more compacting states or territories shall call additional meetings.

The commission shall submit a budget to the governor of each compacting state and territory at such time and for such period as may be required.

The commission shall, after negotiations with interested institutions, determine the cost of providing the facilities for graduate and professional education for use in its contractual agreements throughout the region.

On or before the fifteenth day of January of each year, the commission shall submit to the governors and legislatures of the compacting states and territories a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year.

The commission shall keep accurate books of account, showing in full its receipts and disbursements, and said books of account shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by the governor of any compacting state or territory or his designated representative. The commission shall not be subject to the audit and accounting procedure of any of the compacting states or territories. The commission shall provide for an independent annual audit.
 
Article 8
It shall be the duty of the commission to enter into such contractual agreements with any institutions in the region offering graduate or professional education and with any of the compacting states or territories as may be required in the judgment of the commission to provide adequate services and facilities of graduate and professional education for the citizens of the respective compacting states or territories. The commission shall first endeavor to provide adequate services and facilities in the fields of dentistry, medicine, public health, and veterinary medicine, and may undertake similar activities in other professional and graduate fields.

For this purpose the commission may enter into contractual agreements—

(a) With the governing authority of any educational institution in the region, or with any compacting state or territory, to provide such graduate or professional educational services upon terms and conditions to be agreed upon between contracting parties, and

(b) With the governing authority of any educational institution in the region or with any compacting state or territory to assist in the placement of graduate or professional students in educational institutions in the region providing the desired services and facilities, upon such terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe.

It shall be the duty of the commission to undertake studies of needs for professional and graduate educational facilities in the region, the resources for meeting such needs, and the long-range effects of the compact on higher education; and from time to time prepare comprehensive reports on such research for presentation to the Western Governors’ Conference and to the legislatures of the compacting states and territories. In conducting such studies, the commission may confer with any national or regional planning body which may be established. The commission shall draft and recommend to the governors of the various compacting states and territories, uniform legislation dealing with problems of higher education in the region.

For the purposes of this compact the word “region” shall be construed to mean the geographical limits of the several compacting states and territories. 
 
Article 9
The operating costs of the commission shall be apportioned equally among the compacting states and territories.
 
Article 10
This compact shall become operative and binding immediately as to those states and territories adopting it whenever five or more of the States or Territories of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, and Hawaii have duly adopted it prior to July 1, 1953. This compact shall become effective as to any additional states or territories adopting thereafter at the time of such adoption.
 
Article 11
This compact may be terminated at any time by consent of a majority of the compacting states or territories. Consent shall be manifested by passage and signature in the usual manner of legislation expressing such consent by the legislature and governor of such terminating state. Any state or territory may at any time withdraw from this compact by means of appropriate legislation to that end. Such withdrawal shall not become effective until two years after written notice thereof by the governor of the withdrawing state or territory accompanied by a certified copy of the requisite legislative action is received by the commission. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state or territory from its obligations hereunder accruing prior to the effective date of withdrawal. The withdrawing state or territory may rescind its action of withdrawal at any time within the two-year period. Thereafter, the withdrawing state or territory may be reinstated by application to and the approval by a majority vote of the commission. 
 
Article 12
If any compacting state or territory shall at any time default in the performance of any of its obligations assumed or imposed in accordance with the provisions of this compact, all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact or agreements hereunder, shall be suspended from the effective date of such default as fixed by the commission.

Unless such default shall be remedied within a period of two years following the effective date of such default, this compact may be terminated with respect to such defaulting state or territory by affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other member states or territories.

Any such defaulting state may be reinstated by: (a) performing all acts and obligations upon which it has heretofore defaulted, and (b) application to and the approval by a majority vote of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

99002.

In furtherance of the provisions contained in the compact, there shall be three commissioners from the State of California, appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. The qualifications and terms of the commissioners shall be in accordance with Article 4 of the compact. A commissioner shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified but such successor’s term shall expire four years from the legal date of expiration of the term of his predecessor. Any commissioner may be removed from office by the Governor upon charges and after a hearing. The term of any commissioner who ceases to hold the required qualifications shall terminate when a successor may be duly appointed. Vacancies occurring in the office of a commissioner from any reason or cause shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as for a full term appointment.

Each commissioner shall receive his necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties in behalf of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

99003.

All officers of the state are hereby authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular; it being hereby declared to be the policy of this state to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish the purposes thereof. All officers, bureaus, departments and persons of and in the state government or administration of the state are hereby authorized and directed at convenient times and upon request of the commission to furnish the commission with information and data possessed by them and to aid such commission by any means lying within their legal rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

99004.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of its activities and shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before the 31st day of December in each year, setting forth in detail the transactions conducted by it during that calendar year and shall make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by it advisable, including amendments to the statutes which may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of the compact between the signatory states.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

99005.

When the Governor on behalf of the state executes the compact, he shall attach his signature thereto under a recital that such compact is executed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, subject to the limitations and qualifications contained in this chapter in aid and furtherance thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.3. The Student Financial Responsibility Act [99030. - 99030.]

99030.

The Regents of the University of California and the governing body of each accredited private or independent college or university in the state are requested to, and the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, adopt policies to regulate the marketing practices used on campuses by credit card companies. In adopting the policies, it is the intent of the Legislature that those entities consider including all of the following requirements:

(a) That sites at which student credit cards are marketed be registered with the campus administration and that consideration be given to limiting the number of sites allowed on a campus.

(b) That marketers of student credit cards be prohibited from offering gifts to students for filling out credit card applications.

(c) That credit card and debt education and counseling sessions become a regular part of campus orientation of new students. For purposes of this section, colleges and universities shall utilize existing debt education materials prepared by nonprofit entities and thus not incur the expense of preparing new materials.

(d) For the purposes of this chapter, “student credit card” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (m) of Section 1747.02 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.4. The College Student Credit Protection Act [99040. - 99040.]

99040.

(a) The Regents of the University of California are urged to, and the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, perform the following functions:

(1) Annually direct each campus to disclose all exclusive arrangements, excluding proprietary information, with banks or other commercial entities to engage in on-campus marketing of credit cards to students through solicitation activities in public campus areas, hereafter referred to as “tabling” activities.

(2) Prohibit banks and other commercial entities, including their third-party representatives, during on-campus tabling activities from offering gifts to students for filling out student credit card applications. Banks and other commercial entities, including their third-party representatives, may rely on the self-identification of students for purposes of complying with this paragraph.

(b) The Regents of the University of California are urged to revise the University of California Policy on the On-Campus Marketing of Credit Cards to Students (July 28, 2004) by removing the exemptions in Section VIII of the policy as it relates to all future contractual agreements with any bank or other commercial entity that provides banking and other financial services to the campus community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.7. Higher Education Regional Workforce Coordination [99070. - 99070.]

99070.

The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, participate in regional conversations pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, submit a summary of those first-year activities to the Legislature on or before May 1, 2019, on both of the following:

(a) Recommendations made, partnerships developed, activities undertaken by individual campuses, programs, or the university system that have substantively included local and regional workforce partners and that were designed to increase the number of degrees or other forms of workforce
 preparation in high-demand occupations and industry sectors within one or more regions in the state.

(b) Barriers to addressing regional workforce demands and
 recommendations to overcome these barriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 661, Sec. 2.   (AB 957)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Human Corps [99100. - 99106.]

99100.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California students have a long and rich tradition of participation in community service which should be recognized, commended, and expanded.

(2) There is a growing national consensus that student participation in community services enhances the undergraduate experience.

(3) Student community service is an activity of extreme importance to the mission of the university and deserves to be conducted both for academic credit and otherwise.

(4) The state’s postsecondary educational institutions are charged to maintain a tradition of public service as well as teaching and research.

(5) Access to the privilege of attending the university is made possible for many by our state’s tradition of keeping fees and tuition low.

(6) Practical learning experiences in the real world are valuable for the development of a student’s sense of self, skills, and education.

(7) Our state faces enormous unmet human needs and social challenges including undereducated children, increasing illiteracy and teenage parenting, environmental contamination, homelessness, school dropouts, and growing needs for elder care.

(8) The state’s ability to face these challenges requires policymakers to find creative and cost-effective solutions including increased efforts for community and student public service.

(9) The Legislature and the State of California provide substantial incentives and subsidies for its citizens to attend the state’s postsecondary education institutions, public and private, which are among the finest in the world.

(10) Current volunteer efforts conducted by community organizations reach only a fraction of the need. The need for public service is great because private, state, and federal funding are insufficient to pay for all the social services needed.

(11) Existing community service efforts have successfully demonstrated that participation in public service is of mutual benefit to participating students and the recipients of their services.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to do all of the following:

(1) Complete the college experience by providing students an opportunity to develop themselves and their skills in real-world learning experiences.

(2) To help nurture a sense of human community and social responsibility in our college students.

(3) Invite the fullest possible cooperation between postsecondary education institutions, schools, public, private, and nonprofit agencies, and philanthropies to plan, fund, and implement expanded opportunities for student participation in community life through public service in organized programs.

(4) To substantially increase college student participation in community services, with the ultimate goal of 100 percent participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 285.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

99101.

There is hereby created a program known as The Human Corps within the University of California and the California State University. The California Community Colleges, proprietary schools, and member institutions of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities are strongly encouraged to implement Human Corps programs. The purpose of the corps is to provide every student an ongoing opportunity throughout his or her college career to participate in a community service activity. Toward this goal, beginning in the fall term in 1988, full-time students, including both undergraduate and graduate students, entering the University of California, the California State University, or an institution that is a member of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities to pursue a degree shall be strongly encouraged and expected, although not required, to participate in the Human Corps by providing an average of 30 hours of community service in each academic year. The segments shall determine how to encourage and monitor student participation. The segments are strongly encouraged to develop flexible programs that permit the widest possible student involvement, including participation by part-time students and others for whom participation may be difficult due to financial, academic, personal, or other considerations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1245, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99102.

For the purposes of this article, community service shall be defined as work or service performed by students either voluntarily or for some form of compensation or academic credit through nonprofit, governmental, and community-based organizations, schools, or college campuses. In general, the work or service should be designed to provide direct experience with people or project planning, and should have the goal of improving the quality of life for the community. Eligible activities may include, but are not limited to, tutoring, literacy training, neighborhood improvement, increasing environmental safety, assisting the elderly or disabled, and providing mental health care, particularly for disadvantaged or low-income residents.

In developing community service programs, campuses shall emphasize efforts which can most effectively use the skills of students such as tutoring programs or literacy programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1245, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99103.
